Hawaii, session 2026, SB2592.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that there are compelling interests in protecting the public health, safety, and welfare from the serious hazards associated with firearms and gun violence.  Incidents of firearm-inflicted harm, including violence, unintentional discharge, and self-harm are rising on a yearly basis.  To properly address the rising number of gun-related incidents within Hawaii, supervision of rising and falling trends is vital in identifying the effectiveness of existing gun laws and regulations, along with identifying areas that require legislative attention. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to create a comprehensive annual report that compiles important information on firearms, firearm-related deaths and injuries, and firearm violations.  This annual report will allow the State and the public to better track firearm-related trends and better recognize areas of risk that require remedy. SECTION 2. Chapter 134, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§134-    Firearms; annual report.  (a)  No later than April 1, 2027, and April 1 of each year thereafter, the department shall publish, on its public website, a report that includes: (1)  The firearm permitting and licensing data required by section 134-14; (2)  The firearm licenses to carry data required by section 134-9.6; (3)  The total number of firearm purchases for the prior year, categorized by private or dealer sales, and including, where available, the classification of firearm sold and transferred, categorized by the make and model; (4)  The total number of firearm-related deaths, categorized by the cause of death, such as violence, unintentional discharge, or self-harm; (5)  The number of firearm-related injuries, categorized by the cause of the injury, such as violence, unintentional discharge, or self-harm; (6)  The number of reported firearms that are unaccounted for, categorized by whether the firearm went missing in transit or was lost or stolen.  For firearms that were lost or stolen, the report shall include the following: (A)  The location where the firearm was stored, such as within a residence, public facility, or vehicle; and (B)  The method of storage, including whether the storage complied with applicable firearm storage requirements; (7)  The total number of firearm storage violations issued, categorized by: (A)  Whether the item in violation was a firearm or ammunition; (B)  Whether the violation occurred in a residence or vehicle; (C)  Any resulting loss or theft of the firearm; and (D)  Any resulting violence, unintentional discharge, or self-harm; (8)  The total number of the following firearms confiscated by law enforcement: (A)  Ghost guns; (B)  Firearms lacking serial numbers; and (C)  Firearms that were not commercially manufactured; (9)  For firearms involved in violence, unintentional discharge, or self-harm, the following information: (A)  Firearm classification; (B)  Make and model; (C)  Whether the firearm was legally owned by the operator; and (D)  If not legally owned by the operator, how the firearm was obtained and in which state the weapon was originally purchased; (10)  For firearm operators involved in firearm-related violence, unintentional discharge, or self-harm, the following information: (A)  Gender; (B)  Age; (C)  Race or ethnicity; (D)  Past criminal history; and (E)  Past mental health or substance abuse issues relevant to the incident; (11)  For victims of violence, unintentional discharge, or self-harm involving a firearm, the following information: (A)  Gender; (B)  Age; (C)  Race or ethnicity; and (D)  Relationship to the firearm operator; (12)  Areas most affected by firearm violence, unintentional discharge, and self-harm; (13)  Any other information that the department deems necessary for evaluating the effectiveness of existing gun laws and regulations or for identifying areas that require legislative attention; and (14)  The sources used to compile the report. (b) No later than February 1 of each year, the chief of police of each county, director of the department of health, and the director of any other relevant department or agency, shall supply the department with data required to produce the report described in subsection (a). (c) As used in this section, "department" means the department of the attorney general." SECTION 3. New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4. This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________